src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB_DIGATA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 73 back 0~g
!!€  digata: digata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # dig
0:at  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:at  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:gaa  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:gaa  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ga  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:gas  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:gas  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ga  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:at  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:an  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:at  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:at  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kaa  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_LOBATA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 73 back 0~b
!!€  lobata: lobata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # lobby
0:at  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:at  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:baa  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:baa  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ba  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:bas  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:bas  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ba  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:at  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:an  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:at  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:at  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:baa  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_KARHUTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 back 
!!€  karhuta: karhuta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # tax
0:t  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:s  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:s  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:n  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_TÄHYTÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 front 
!!€  tähytä: tähytä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # periscope
0:t  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:ä  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ä  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ä  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Ä  ;
0:s  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:s  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ä  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:n  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ä  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_KAIKOTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 back 0~k 
!!€  kaikota: kaikota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # disappear
0:ot  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:koa  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:koa  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:koa  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:kos  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:kos  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:koa  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:on  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:koa  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_POIKETA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 back 0~k e 
!!€  poiketa: poiketa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat 
0:et  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kea  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kea  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:kea  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:kes  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:kes  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:kea  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:en  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:et  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kea  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_KERETÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 front 0~k e 
!!€  keretä: keretä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat 
0:et  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:et  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:keä  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:keä  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:keä  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Ä  ;
0:kes  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:kes  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:keä  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:et  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:en  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:et  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:et  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:keä  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_KOUKUTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 front   0~k u 
!!€  koukuta: koukuta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # hook
0:ut  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ut  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kua  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kua  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:kua  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:kus  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:kus  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:kua  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ut  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:un  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:u  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:ut  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ut  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kua  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_PULPUTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 back 0~p 
!!€  pulputa: pulputa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # pulp
0:ut  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ut  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pua  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pua  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:pua  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:pus  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:pus  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pua  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ut  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:un  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:u  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:ut  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ut  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pua  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_UPOTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 back 0~p o 
!!€  upota: upota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # sink
0:ot  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:poa  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:poa  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:poa  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:pos  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:pos  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:poa  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:on  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:poa  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_LOTOTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 back 0~to
!!€  lotota: lotota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # lotto
0:ot  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:toa  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:toa  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:toa  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:tos  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:tos  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:toa  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:on  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:toa  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_LUUTUTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 back 0~tu
!!€  luututa: luututa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # mop
0:ut  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ut  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:tua  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tua  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:tua  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:tus  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:tus  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tua  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ut  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:un  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:u  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:ut  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ut  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tua  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_KIVUTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 back v~p 
!!€  kivuta: kivuta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # climb
0:vut  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:vut  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pua  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pua  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:pua  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:pus  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:pus  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pua  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:vut  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:vun  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:vu  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:vut  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:vut  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pua  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_KORVETA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 back v~pe
!!€  korveta: korveta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat 
0:vet  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:vet  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pea  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pea  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:pea  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:pes  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:pes  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pea  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:vet  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ven  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ve  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:vet  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:vet  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pea  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_REVETÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 front v~pe
!!€  kiivetä: kiivetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # climb
0:vet  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:vet  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:peä  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:peä  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:peä  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Ä  ;
0:pes  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:pes  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:peä  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:vet  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ven  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ve  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:vet  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:vet  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:peä  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;
