src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB
aueta+V:au  VERB_POIKETA  ;
digata+V:dig  VERB_DIGATA  ;
erota+V:ero  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
esikoota+V:esiko  VERB_KAIKOTA  ;
hajota+V:hajo  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
heikota+V:heik  VERB_KAIKOTA  ;
hillota+V:hillo  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
himota+V:himo  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
hiota+V:hi  VERB_KAIKOTA  ;
hirvetä+V:hirve  VERB_TÄHYTÄ  ;
holhota+V:holho  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
huhuta+V:huhu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
huuruta+V:huuru  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
hymytä+V:hymy  VERB_TÄHYTÄ  ;
hyrskytä+V:hyrsky  VERB_TÄHYTÄ  ;
hävetä+V:hä  VERB_REVETÄ  ;
höyrytä+V:höyry  VERB_TÄHYTÄ  ;
inhota+V:inho  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
isota+V:iso  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
janota+V:jano  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
juoruta+V:juoru  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
kaihota+V:kaiho  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
kaikota+V:kaik  VERB_KAIKOTA  ;
kajota+V:kajo  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
kaluta+V:kalu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
kammota+V:kammo  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
karhuta+V:karhu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
karkota+V:kark  VERB_KAIKOTA  ;
kasketa+V:kaske  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
katketa+V:katke  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
kavuta+V:ka  VERB_KIVUTA  ;
keretä+V:ker  VERB_KERETÄ  ;
kihota+V:kiho  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
kiihkota+V:kiihko  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
kiivetä+V:kii  VERB_REVETÄ  ;
kimmota+V:kimmo  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
kinuta+V:kinu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
kirnuta+V:kirnu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
kirota+V:kiro  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
kiukuta+V:kiuk  VERB_KOUKUTA  ;
kivetä+V:kive  VERB_TÄHYTÄ  ;
kivuta+V:ki  VERB_KIVUTA  ;
kohota+V:koho  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
koluta+V:kolu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
koota+V:ko  VERB_KAIKOTA  ;
korveta+V:kor  VERB_KORVETA  ;
koukuta+V:kouk  VERB_KOUKUTA  ;
kumota+V:kumo  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
kuohuta+V:kuohu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
kutkuta+V:kutku  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
könytä+V:köny  VERB_TÄHYTÄ  ;
lahota+V:laho  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
laota+V:la  VERB_KAIKOTA  ;
laueta+V:lau  VERB_POIKETA  ;
leimuta+V:leimu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
lemuta+V:lemu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
lihota+V:liho  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
liota+V:li  VERB_KAIKOTA  ;
lipota+V:lip  VERB_UPOTA  ;
liuota+V:liu  VERB_KAIKOTA  ;
livetä+V:li  VERB_REVETÄ  ;
lobata+V:lob  VERB_LOBATA  ;
loruta+V:loru  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
lotota+V:lot  VERB_LOTOTA  ;
loveta+V:love  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
lumeta+V:lume  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
lumota+V:lumo  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
luututa+V:luut  VERB_LUUTUTA  ;
löhötä+V:löhö  VERB_TÄHYTÄ  ;
menota+V:meno  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
mesota+V:meso  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
messuta+V:messu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
mouruta+V:mouru  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
netota+V:net  VERB_LOTOTA  ;
noeta+V:no  VERB_POIKETA  ;
notketa+V:notke  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
nuohota+V:nuoho  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
oieta+V:oi  VERB_POIKETA  ;
paastota+V:paasto  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
pauhuta+V:pauhu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
pelmuta+V:pelmu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
pietä+V:pi  VERB_KERETÄ  ;
pinota+V:pino  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
poiketa+V:poik  VERB_POIKETA  ;
poukota+V:pouk  VERB_KAIKOTA  ;
promota+V:promo  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
pulputa+V:pulp  VERB_PULPUTA  ;
pumputa+V:pump  VERB_PULPUTA  ;
pursuta+V:pursu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
raivota+V:raivo  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
ratketa+V:ratke  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
raueta+V:rau  VERB_POIKETA  ;
remuta+V:remu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
resuta+V:resu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
revetä+V:re  VERB_REVETÄ  ;
ristetä+V:riste  VERB_TÄHYTÄ  ;
rohmuta+V:rohmu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
roihuta+V:roihu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
rosvota+V:rosvo  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
ruiskuta+V:ruisku  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
ruokota+V:ruok  VERB_KAIKOTA  ;
ruota+V:ru  VERB_KAIKOTA  ;
ruveta+V:ru  VERB_KORVETA  ;
samota+V:samo  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
saota+V:sa  VERB_KAIKOTA  ;
sauhuta+V:sauhu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
saveta+V:save  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
savuta+V:savu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
seota+V:se  VERB_KAIKOTA  ;
sietä+V:si  VERB_KERETÄ  ;
siivota+V:siivo  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
silputa+V:silp  VERB_PULPUTA  ;
sirota+V:siro  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
soieta+V:soi  VERB_POIKETA  ;
sueta+V:su  VERB_POIKETA  ;
suihkuta+V:suihku  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
sumuta+V:sumu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
syyhytä+V:syyhy  VERB_TÄHYTÄ  ;
tajuta+V:taju  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
takuta+V:tak  VERB_KOUKUTA  ;
tarjota+V:tarjo  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
tauota+V:tau  VERB_KAIKOTA  ;
tenhota+V:tenho  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
tomuta+V:tomu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
touhuta+V:touhu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
tuiskuta+V:tuisku  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
tuketa+V:tuk  VERB_POIKETA  ;
tupruta+V:tupru  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
tyvetä+V:tyve  VERB_TÄHYTÄ  ;
tähytä+V:tähy  VERB_TÄHYTÄ  ;
uhota+V:uho  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
upota+V:up  VERB_UPOTA  ;
vainuta+V:vainu  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
vajota+V:vajo  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
verhota+V:verho  VERB_KARHUTA  ;
virota+V:vir  VERB_KAIKOTA  ;
vivuta+V:vi  VERB_KIVUTA  ;
yrjötä+V:yrjö  VERB_TÄHYTÄ  ;
älytä+V:äly  VERB_TÄHYTÄ  ;
öljytä+V:öljy  VERB_TÄHYTÄ  ;
